Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 102. On-Site Sewage Systems

§ 3631.
Definition.

As used in this chapter:

“Sewage system” means an on-site sewage disposal system.

“Proper performance” means a sewage system which operates so as to:

prevent surfacing of sewage and the creation of a health hazard; and

prevent the pollution and contamination of drinking water supplies, groundwater, and surface water; and

maintain sanitary and healthful conditions during operation.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3632.
Standards for ordinances.

The Secretary of Natural Resources shall adopt by rule minimum standards for municipal ordinances regulating sewage systems.

The purpose of these standards shall be to achieve the proper performance of sewage systems.

The rules may contain recommended procedures for municipalities to use in considering applications for permits.

The rules shall contain standards and procedures for approving innovative sewage systems.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3633.
Ordinance.

A municipality may adopt an ordinance under chapter 59 of this title relating to sewage systems.

The ordinance shall not take effect until it is approved by the Department of Environmental Conservation as being at least as stringent as the minimum standards under section 3632 of this title.

The ordinance shall describe the officer or officers, which may include the local health officer, responsible for its enforcement.

Municipal ordinances relating to sewage systems that were approved before July 1984 under

18 V.S.A. § 613

by the Board of Health shall remain in effect and shall be deemed to have been adopted and approved under this section. Municipal ordinances relating to sewage systems that were approved before July 1984 by the Commissioner of Health shall remain in effect until either the ordinance has been approved pursuant to this chapter or July 1, 2002, whichever occurs first.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1987, No. 76

, § 18;

1993, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1997, No. 51

, § 4;

1997, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 19a;

1999, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 3634.
Permit.

An ordinance under this chapter shall require a permit for the installation or replacement of sewage systems.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3635.
Limitation.

Nothing in this chapter or in any ordinance relieves any person of obligations under the law for the proper performance of a sewage system.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.